North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-10 The State Board of Higher Education
15-10-17.
Specific powers and duties of the state board of higher education.

The state board of higher education has all the powers and shall perform all the duties necessary to the control and management of the institutions described in this chapter. In addition to the powers and duties specified in section 6 of article VIII of the Constitution of North Dakota, the board may:

Appoint and remove the president or other faculty head, and the professors, instructors, teachers, officers, and other employees of the several institutions under the board’s control, fix the salaries for those positions within the limits of legislative appropriations; and fix the terms of office and prescribe the duties of the positions.

Appoint and remove the commissioner of higher education, fix the commissioner’s salary within the limits of legislative appropriations, and prescribe the commissioner’s duties.

Appoint and remove all university system office personnel, fix their salaries within the limits of legislative appropriations, fix their terms of office, and prescribe their duties.

The board may hold an executive session to consider the appointment or removal of the commissioner of higher education, or a president or other faculty head, professor, instructor, teacher, officer, or other employee of an institution under the board’s control unless the individual involved requests the meeting be open to other individuals or the public.

Authorize the employment of law enforcement officers having jurisdiction on property owned or leased by the state board of higher education to enforce laws and regulations at its institutions, or as otherwise provided in this subsection.

A law enforcement officer employed by North Dakota state university has jurisdiction on all property owned or leased by the state board of higher education and property on and within the boundaries of the intersection of nineteenth avenue north and Dakota drive south to eighth avenue north, eighth avenue north east to tenth street north, tenth street north north to nineteenth avenue north, nineteenth avenue north west to Dakota drive.

A law enforcement officer employed by the university of North Dakota has jurisdiction on all property owned or leased by the state board of higher education and property on and within the boundaries of the intersection of demers avenue and north fifty-fifth street, north fifty-fifth street north to university avenue, university avenue east to north forty-second street, north forty-second street north to gateway drive, gateway drive east to north columbia road, north columbia road south to tenth avenue north, tenth avenue north east to north twenty-fifth street, north twenty-fifth street south to sixth avenue north, sixth avenue north east to north twentieth street, north twentieth street south to fifth avenue north, fifth avenue north west to north twenty-third street, north twenty-third street south to university avenue, university avenue east to north twenty-first street, north twenty-first street south to dyke avenue, dyke avenue east to north washington street, north washington street south to demers avenue, and demers avenue west to north fifty-fifth street. Jurisdiction under this subdivision includes Grand Forks international airport.

A law enforcement officer employed by the North Dakota state college of science has jurisdiction on all property owned or leased by the state board of higher education and property on and within the boundaries of the intersection of seventh avenue north and eleventh street north, eleventh street north to sixteenth avenue north, sixteenth avenue north west to fourth street north, and fourth street north south to seventh avenue north.

A law enforcement officer employed by Bismarck state college has jurisdiction on all property owned or leased by the state board of higher education and property on and within the boundaries of the area delineated by the intersections of schafer street and canary avenue, canary avenue and edwards avenue, edwards avenue and schafer street, edwards avenue and ward road, ward road and college drive, and college drive and schafer street.

A law enforcement officer employed by an institution under the control of the state board of higher education who is in “fresh pursuit” may continue beyond the jurisdictional boundaries of each institution to make an arrest, in compliance with a warrant or without a warrant under the conditions of section 29-06-15, if obtaining the aid of peace officers having jurisdiction beyond that limit would cause a delay permitting escape. As used in this subdivision, “fresh pursuit” has the same meaning as in section 29-06-07.

The state board of higher education may enter a joint powers agreement with a political subdivision to enable law enforcement from the political subdivision and law enforcement from the institution to provide secondary response to each other outside the jurisdictional boundaries provided in this subsection.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or joint powers agreement, any misdemeanor or felony violation of law occurring in or on property owned or leased by the state board of higher education or within the extraterritorial jurisdiction must be filed in district court unless the primary law enforcement officer involved is not employed by the state board of higher education. An infraction or noncriminal offense occurring in or on property owned or leased by the state board of higher education or within the extraterritorial jurisdiction may be filed in municipal court.

Set tuition and fees.

Establish a retirement program as an alternative to chapter 15-39.1 for university system employees subject to the following guidelines:

Benefits under the program must be provided through annuity contracts purchased by the board but which become the property of the participants;

The cost of the annuity contracts must be defrayed by contributions made pursuant to rules of the state board of higher education;

Eligible employees appointed before July 1, 1973, shall participate in the alternate retirement program only by their individual election. When the electing eligible employee is a member of the teachers’ fund for retirement, the employee’s assessments and employer’s contributions together with interest credited at the current rate for one-year certificates then being paid by the Bank of North Dakota must be transferred to the employee’s account in the alternate program. The election must be made before July 1, 1980, and shall relinquish all rights the eligible employee or the employee’s beneficiary may have to benefits provided in chapters 15-39 and 15-39.2; and

Employees of the university system who are members of the public employees retirement system under chapter 54-52 or 54-52.6 and who become entitled to participate in the alternate retirement program are entitled to a special annuity purchase in the alternate retirement program in accordance with this subdivision. An eligible employee who consents to have that employee’s contribution included is entitled to have that employee’s contribution and employer’s contribution, with interest, in the public employees retirement system fund, used by the retirement board of the public employees retirement system to purchase for that employee an annuity in the alternate retirement program in lieu of any other rights under the public employees retirement fund. However, before the employer’s contribution may be used for an annuity purchase, the employee’s combined years of service with the public employees retirement system and the alternate retirement program must equal or exceed the years of service necessary to be eligible for retirement benefits under the public employees retirement system. An employee who transferred from the public employees retirement system before March 30, 1987, and who received a refund of that employee’s contribution is entitled to have the employer’s contribution, with interest, used to purchase an annuity even if that employee did not purchase an annuity in the alternate employee program with the employee’s contribution. If an employee makes the election allowed under this subdivision, that employee relinquishes all rights the employee or any of the employee’s beneficiaries may have had to benefits provided under chapters 54-52 and 54-52.6.

Provide for the administration of the alternate retirement program and establish rules for the program consistent with this subsection. This subsection does not derogate any existing retirement programs approved by the board.

Determine policy for purchasing by the university system in coordination with the office of management and budget as provided by law.

Establish by rule an early retirement program for faculty and officers of the board as defined by the board. The limitations on severance pay pursuant to section 54-14-04.3 and on requiring the employee to pay contributions to continue on the state uniform group insurance program upon retirement or upon termination of employment pursuant to section 54-52.1-03 do not apply to the early retirement program.

Adopt rules to protect the confidentiality of student records, medical records, and, consistent with section 44-04-18.4, trade secret, proprietary, commercial, and financial information.

Authorize and encourage university system entities to enter into partnerships, limited liability companies, joint ventures, or other contractual arrangements with private business and industry for the purpose of business or industrial development or fostering basic and applied research or technology transfer.

Adopt rules promoting research, encouraging development of intellectual property and other inventions and discoveries by university system employees, and protecting and marketing the inventions and discoveries. The rules must govern ownership or transfer of ownership rights and distribution of income that may be derived from an invention or discovery resulting from research or employment in the university system. The rules may provide for transfer of ownership rights or distribution of income to a private, nonprofit entity created for the support of the university system or one of its institutions.

Source:

S.L. 1883, Sp., ch. 40, §§ 3, 5, 8, 12; 1883 Sp., ch. 42, § 2; 1887, ch. 168, § 1; 1890, ch. 158, §§ 4, 5; 1890, ch. 160, §§ 6, 9; 1891, ch. 89, §§ 14, 15; R.C. 1895, §§ 878, 881, 884, 890, 893, 914, 915, 926, 927, 939, 941; S.L. 1897, ch. 89, §§ 17, 18; R.C. 1899, §§ 878, 881, 884, 890, 893, 914, 915, 926, 927, 939, 941, 982; S.L. 1903, ch. 50, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 1043, 1046, 1049, 1055, 1058, 1083, 1084, 1095, 1096, 1105, 1107, 1179; S.L. 1907, ch. 240, § 3; 1911, ch. 61, §§ 10, 11; C.L. 1913, §§ 1542, 1545, 1548, 1554, 1557, 1587, 1588, 1599, 1600, 1609, 1611, 1732; S.L. 1915, ch. 237, § 7; 1925 Supp., § 364a7; R.C. 1943, § 15-1017; S.L. 1971, ch. 165, § 1; 1971, ch. 166, § 1; 1973, ch. 132, § 3; 1973, ch. 133, § 1; 1979, ch. 206, § 1; 1979, ch. 207, § 1; 1979, ch. 568, § 7; 1983, ch. 194, § 1; 1983, ch. 319, § 10; 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1985, ch. 205, § 1; 1987, ch. 3, § 14; 1987, ch. 197, § 2; 1987, ch. 199, § 1; 1987, ch. 200, § 1; 1989, ch. 194, § 1; 1989, ch. 195, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 168, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1995, ch. 329, § 1; 1999, ch. 157, § 2; 1999, ch. 439, § 2; 2001, ch. 162, § 1; 2011, ch. 431, § 1; 2017, ch. 87, § 2, effective April 5, 2017; 2021, ch. 121, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 122, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 123, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 15-10-17 was amended 3 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 123, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2168; Section 1 of Chapter 122, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2167; and Section 1 of Chapter 121, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1220.

Section 1 of chapter 134, S.L. 2003, provides:

“

TRANSFER OF LAND AUTHORIZED.

1.

The state board of higher education for the benefit of lake region state college, formerly known as university of North Dakota — lake region and formerly known as lake region community college, may convey the land described in this subsection to the city of Devils Lake, North Dakota, for the price and on the terms as determined by the state board of higher education. The land to be conveyed is described as follows:

A parcel of land situated in the E1/2 of the W1/2 of Section 27, Township 154 North, Range 64 West of the 5th principal meridian, Ramsey County, North Dakota, being more particularly described as follows: All that portion of said section 27 lying west of the east line of the W1/2of said Section 27 and east of the easterly right of way line of the Burlington Northern Railroad. Said parcel is approximately 8 feet in width and 2,900 feet in length. Said parcel contains 26,303 square feet, more or less.

2.

The provisions of

sections 54-01-05.2 and

54-01-05.5 do not apply to the transfer authorized by this Act.”

Sections 1 and 2 of chapter 163, S.L. 2001, effective January 30, 2001, provide:

“

SECTION 1. Construction of student housing on the North Dakota state university campus — Appropriation.

The state board of higher education may authorize North Dakota state university to provide for the construction of a student housing apartment building on the university campus. North Dakota state university may utilize any available local funds or funds received from other sources, including fire insurance recovery proceeds resulting from the F court building fire at that campus, for this project. There is appropriated for this project from local funds or other sources the sum of $2,310,000.”

“

SECTION 2. Renovation of Robinson hall on the North Dakota state university campus — Appropriation.

The state board of higher education may authorize North Dakota state university to provide for the renovation of Robinson hall on the university campus. North Dakota state university may utilize any available federal, private, or local funds or funds received from other sources for this project. There is appropriated for this project from available federal, private, or local funds or other funds the sum of $560,000.”

Section 1 of chapter 49, S.L. 1999, effective April 2, 1999, provides:

“

CONSTRUCTION OF BUILDING ON UNIVERSITY OF NORTH DAKOTA CAMPUS — APPROPRIATION.

The state board of higher education may authorize the university of North Dakota to provide for the construction of a building on the campus for use as a university bookstore and for retail businesses other than for the off-sale of alcoholic beverages. There is appropriated the sum of $4,500,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, from special funds, including donations, gifts, the sale of revenue bonds by or a loan from the university of North Dakota foundation, the sale of existing bookstore inventory, and bookstore reserves, to the university of North Dakota for the construction of a building for a university bookstore and for use for retail businesses other than for the off-sale of alcoholic beverages. The board and the university may lease the building to other entities for use as a bookstore and to retail businesses other than for the off-sale of alcoholic beverages. Any funds received for the lease are appropriated for use in operating and maintaining the building and other institutional needs. Neither the board nor the university may use funds other than the revenue derived from the lease of the building for the operation and maintenance of the building.”

Section 1 of chapter 159, S.L. 1999, effective March 29, 1999, provides:

“

Lease of land — Construction of arena — Authority.

The state board of higher education may negotiate the terms of and enter into an agreement with the university of North Dakota foundation or other entity for the lease of approximately thirty-two acres [12.95 hectares] of land, which was originally gifted to the university of North Dakota, and may do all things necessary and proper to approve the terms of the lease, the plans and design, the title of the building and parking area, and to facilitate the construction with private sector dollars of a winter sports facility at the university of North Dakota, and to provide for its subsequent operation and management.”

Chapter 15-39, referred to in this section, was repealed by section 2 of chapter 184, S.L. 1971. However, section 2 of chapter 184, S.L. 1971, provided that reference could be made to chapter 15-39 to determine rights arising prior to the effective date of chapter 184 (July 1, 1971). As to the teachers’ fund for retirement, see now chapter 15-39.1.

Cross-References.

Contracts for medical education, see N.D.C.C. § 15-52-30.

Exclusion of students from social security coverage, see N.D.C.C. § 52-10-03.1.

Oath required of teachers employed by state supported institutions of higher education, see N.D.C.C. § 15.1-13-15.

Patenting inventions by faculty, officials and employees, see N.D.C.C. ch. 47-28.

15-10-17.1.
Conduct of students and others and use of facilities of state colleges and universities. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-10-17.2.
Claims against institutions of higher education — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 329, § 14.

15-10-17.3.
Political advertising — Student housing.

A state institution of higher education may not include in student housing leases provisions that prohibit lessees from placing political advertisements on the leased property. A political advertising sign placed on student housing property must be placed in compliance with any applicable city ordinance relating to signs.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 163, § 1.

15-10-17.4.
Contract — Preparation and provision of meals — Policy.

An institution under the control of the state board of higher education may enter a contract to prepare and provide meals, snacks, or other food services for persons or programs not affiliated with the institution and may provide catering services for an event if the event is organized predominantly for persons affiliated with the institution, the event is held predominantly for persons enrolled in the institution, or the event is held under the auspices of the institution, provided the institution first establishes a policy regarding such services and specifically addresses issues related to competition with private sector entities.

The limitations provided under subsection 1 do not apply to an institution under the control of the state board of higher education if no private sector entity located in the same city as the institution is capable and willing to meet the facility or personnel requirements necessary to:

Prepare and provide the meals, snacks, or other food services for a specific event; or

Provide the catering services for a specific event.

An institution under the control of the state board of higher education may not advertise to the general public its willingness to provide the services permitted under this section.

Nothing in this section may be construed to limit the activities of a private sector entity that provides meals, snacks, or other food services to an institution of higher education under the provisions of a contract.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 36, § 13; 2007, ch. 153, § 1.

15-10-17.5.
Quorums of state board of higher education committees.

The state board of higher education may create committees comprised of voting members of the board. The scope of authority for a committee created under this section must be defined in a policy adopted by the board, and the committee’s actions may not exceed that scope.

If a committee comprised of voting members of the board constitutes a quorum of the board, a properly noticed meeting of the committee does not constitute a meeting of the board. Actions of the committee do not constitute actions of the board.

If a committee comprised of voting members of the board constitutes, in whole or in part, a quorum of another committee of the board, a properly noticed meeting of one committee’s meeting does not constitute a meeting of the other committee, unless the meeting of the other committee also is properly noticed. Actions taken at the meeting are limited to the scope of authority of the committee for which the meeting was noticed properly.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 121, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

15-10-18.
Tuition of nonresidents at schools under control of state board of higher education.

At all state institutions of higher education, tuition must be charged and collected from each nonresident student in such amount as must be determined by the state board of higher education.

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 214, §§ 1, 3, 4; R.C. 1943, § 15-1018; S.L. 1965, ch. 122, § 1; 1973, ch. 134, § 1; 1983, ch. 82, § 21; 1999, ch. 161, § 1.

Cross-References.

Reciprocal higher education agreements affecting tuition, see N.D.C.C.§§ 15-10-28 , 15-10-28.2 , 15-52-30 and N.D.C.C. ch. 15-10.1.

Collateral References.

Validity and application of provisions governing determination of residency for purpose of fixing fee differential for out-of-state students in public college, 56 A.L.R.3d 641.

Increase in tuition as actionable in suit by student against college or university, 99 A.L.R.3d 885.

Absence from or inability to attend school or college as affecting liability for tuition or board, 20 A.L.R.4th 303.

15-10-18.1.
Waiver of tuition at state institutions for North Dakota youth correctional center graduates. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-10-18.2.
Definitions.

“Dependent” for purposes of section 15-10-18.3 means:

A child, stepchild, spouse, widow, or widower of a resident veteran, as “veteran” is defined in section 37-01-40, who was killed in action or died from wounds or other service-connected causes, has a one hundred percent service-connected disability as determined by the department of veterans’ affairs, has an extra-schedular rating to include individual unemployability that brings the veteran’s total disability rating to one hundred percent as determined by the department of veterans’ affairs, died from service-connected disabilities, was a prisoner of war, or was declared missing in action;

A child, stepchild, spouse, widow, or widower of a veteran, as defined in section 37-01-40, who was killed in action or died from wounds or other service-connected causes, has a one hundred percent service-connected disability as determined by the department of veterans’ affairs, has an extra-schedular rating to include individual unemployability that brings the veteran’s total disability rating to one hundred percent as determined by the department of veterans’ affairs, died from service-connected disabilities, was a prisoner of war, or was declared missing in action, provided the spouse, widow, or widower, or the child’s or stepchild’s other parent, has been a resident of this state and was a resident of this state at the time of death or determination of total disability of the veteran; or

A child, stepchild, spouse, widow, or widower of a veteran, as defined in section 37-01-40, who was killed in action or died from wounds or other service-connected causes, has a one hundred percent service-connected disability as determined by the department of veterans’ affairs, has an extra-schedular rating to include individual unemployability that brings the veteran’s total disability rating to one hundred percent as determined by the department of veterans’ affairs, died from service-connected disabilities, was a prisoner of war, or was declared missing in action, provided the spouse, widow, or widower, or the child’s or stepchild’s other parent, establishes residency in this state and maintains that residency for a period of five years immediately preceding the spouse’s, widow’s, widower’s, child’s, or stepchild’s enrollment at an institution under the control of the state board of higher education.

“Resident veteran” means a veteran who:

Was born in and lived in this state until entrance into the armed forces of the United States;

Was born in, but was temporarily living outside this state, not having abandoned residence therein prior to entrance into the armed forces of the United States;

Was born elsewhere but had resided within this state for at least six months prior to entrance into military service and had prior to or during such six-month period:

Registered for voting, or voted in this state;

Being an unemancipated minor during such period of residence, had lived with a parent or person standing in loco parentis who had acquired a residence as set forth in this section; or

If not registered for voting in this state, not registered for voting in another state; or

Has been a resident of this state for the five years prior to the request for tuition waiver.

“Stepchild’s other parent” means the spouse, widow, or widower of a veteran.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 135, § 1; 1979, ch. 215, § 1; 1985, ch. 397, § 1; 1987, ch. 201, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 1; 2005, ch. 140, § 1; 2009, ch. 158, § 1; 2011, ch. 447, § 1; 2021, ch. 124, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

15-10-18.3.
Free tuition in North Dakota institutions of higher education.

Any dependent, as defined in section 15-10-18.2 upon being duly accepted for enrollment into any undergraduate degree or certificate program of a North Dakota state institution of higher education, must be allowed to obtain a bachelor’s degree or certificate of completion, for so long as the dependent is eligible, free of any tuition and fee charges if the bachelor’s degree or certificate of completion is earned within a forty-five-month or ten-semester period or its equivalent and if tuition and fee charges do not include costs for aviation flight charges or expenses. Once an individual qualifies as a dependent under sections 15-10-18.2 and 15-10-18.3, the dependent may not be disqualified from the benefits of this section:

Due to the return of the prisoner of war;

Due to the return of the individual missing in action; or

Because the veteran through whom the benefit was obtained had a one hundred percent service-connected disability at the time of death.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 135, § 2; 1979, ch. 215, § 2; 1983, ch. 195, § 1; 1991, ch. 3, § 13; 1993, ch. 165, § 1; 2003, ch. 138, § 14; 2005, ch. 141, § 1; 2013, ch. 132, § 1.

15-10-18.4.
Definitions.

For purposes of section 15-10-18.5:

“Firefighter” means a person who is a member of a paid or volunteer fire department that is a part of, or administered by, this state, any political subdivision of this state, or a rural fire protection district.

“Peace officer” means any person who is employed by a state law enforcement agency or a political subdivision of the state who is charged with the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of the criminal laws of the state, and who has full power of arrest.

“Stepchild” means a child of the decedent’s spouse or predeceased spouse, and not of the decedent.

“Survivor” means, at the time of the firefighter’s or peace officer’s death, the firefighter’s or peace officer’s biological or adopted child under the age of twenty-one, stepchild under the age of twenty-one, and spouse.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 2017, ch. 124, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

15-10-18.5.
Free tuition in North Dakota institutions of higher education for survivor of firefighter, emergency medical services personnel, or peace officer.

If a firefighter, an emergency medical services personnel as defined under section 23-27-04.3, or a peace officer dies as a direct result of injuries received while engaged in the performance of official duties under circumstances dangerous to human life, the survivor, upon being duly accepted for enrollment into any undergraduate degree or certificate program of a North Dakota state institution of higher education, must be allowed to obtain a bachelor’s degree or certificate of completion, for so long as the dependent is eligible, free of any tuition and fee charges; provided, however, that the bachelor’s degree or certificate of completion is earned within a forty-five-month or ten-semester period or its equivalent; and further provided that tuition and fee charges may not include costs for aviation flight charges or expenses.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 202, § 2; 1991, ch. 3, § 14; 1993, ch. 165, § 2; 2003, ch. 138, § 15; 2005, ch. 141, § 2.

15-10-19.
Nonresident student for tuition purposes defined — Exceptions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 166, § 2.

Note.

For present provisions, see N.D.C.C. § 15-10-19.1.

15-10-19.1.
Nonresident and resident student for tuition purposes defined.

A “nonresident student” for tuition purposes means any student other than a resident student.

A “resident student” for tuition purposes means:

An individual whose guardian, custodial parent, or parents are legal residents of this state and have resided in this state for twelve months, or a dependent child whose custodial parent moved into the state with the intent to establish legal residency for a period of years within the last twelve months immediately prior to the beginning of the academic term;

An individual of age eighteen or over who is a legal resident of this state and has resided in this state after reaching age eighteen for twelve months immediately prior to the beginning of the academic term;

An individual who graduated from a North Dakota high school;

A full-time active duty member of the armed forces;

A member of the national guard;

A member of the armed forces reserve component; or

A veteran, as defined in section 37-01-40;

A benefited employee of the North Dakota university system;

The spouse of:

A full-time active duty member of the armed forces;

A member of the national guard;

A member of the armed forces reserve component;

A veteran, as defined in section 37-01-40, including a veteran eligible to transfer entitlement under the Post 9-11 Veterans Educational Assistance Act of 2008 [38 U.S.C. 3301];

A benefited employee of the North Dakota university system; or

Any other individual who is a resident for tuition purposes;

A dependent of:

A full-time active duty member of the armed forces;

A member of the national guard;

A member of the armed forces reserve component;

A veteran, as defined in section 37-01-40, including a veteran eligible to transfer entitlement under the Post 9-11 Veterans Educational Assistance Act of 2008 [38 U.S.C. 3301]; or

A benefited employee of the North Dakota university system;

An individual who was a legal resident of this state for at least three consecutive years within six years of the beginning of the academic term;

A child, spouse, widow, or widower of a veteran as defined in section 37-01-40 who was killed in action or died from wounds or other service-connected causes, was totally disabled as a result of service-connected causes, died from service-connected disabilities, was a prisoner of war, or was declared missing in action; or

A covered individual as defined by section 702 of Public Law No. 113-146 [128 Stat. 1797; 38 U.S.C. 3679].

A temporary absence from the state for vacation or other special or temporary purposes may not be considered an abandonment of residency in this state, provided a residence is maintained in this state during the temporary absence. However, a student who leaves the state and resides in another state for a period of months is not considered a resident of this state during those months if the student does not maintain a place of residence in this state during the student’s absence.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 166, § 1; 1995, ch. 169, § 1; 2001, ch. 164, § 1; 2005, ch. 142, § 1; 2009, ch. 158, § 2; 2013, ch. 134, § 1; 2013, ch. 133, § 1; 2015, ch. 129, § 1; 2021, ch. 125, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 129, S.L. 2015 became effective March 12, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 2 of chapter 129, S.L. 2015.

15-10-20.
Tuition at model schools in higher educational institutions — Attendance authorized by district school board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-10-21.
Military instruction required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 162, § 1.

15-10-22.
Course in cooperatives required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 162, § 1.

15-10-23.
Lease of building sites on educational institution grounds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-10-24.
Monthly statements of institutional expenditures and payroll to board of higher education. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 132, § 6.

15-10-25.
Abstracts of expenditures and payroll to the office of management and budget. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 162, § 7.

15-10-25.1.
Out-of-state travel by persons employed by the institutions under the control of the board of higher education. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-10-26.
Appropriations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 120, § 6.

15-10-27.
Appropriations for specific purposes — Payment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 120, § 6.

15-10-28.
Agreements with other states’ institutions of higher learning and regional education compacts.

The state board of higher education may enter into agreements with institutions of higher learning in other states and regional education compacts. The board, subject to the limits of legislative appropriations, may make such expenditures as are necessary for the purpose of utilizing the educational facilities of such institutions for teaching North Dakota students. In addition, the board may enter into agreements with institutions of higher learning in other states and regional education compacts for the acceptance of students from other states in North Dakota institutions of higher learning.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 141, § 1; 1973, ch. 137, § 1; 1977, ch. 148, § 1; 1983, ch. 197, § 1.

Cross-References.

Contracts for medical education, see N.D.C.C. § 15-52-30.

Supplemental authority for reciprocal higher education agreements, see N.D.C.C. ch. 15-10.1.

15-10-28.1.
Board of higher education to require note from veterinary medicine, optometry, or dental student — Repayment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 198, § 1.

15-10-28.2.
Regional veterinary medical education program — Authority to enter agreements — Limitations.

The state board of higher education may enter into agreements with the university of Nebraska board of regents and with the appropriate governing boards or institutions of higher education in other states to provide a program of regional veterinary medical education and services.

Any agreements entered pursuant to subsection 1 may provide for the following:

Service by the university of Nebraska as the degree-granting institution.

Assumption by the university of Nebraska of final responsibility for the overall governance and administration of the educational aspects of the program.

Cooperation by the North Dakota state university of agriculture and applied science in providing input in the establishment of policies relating to curriculum, academic standards, student admissions, and other matters.

Within the limits of legislative appropriations, any agreements entered pursuant to subsection 1 may provide for the payment by the state board of higher education of North Dakota’s share of the cost of facility construction in Nebraska based upon the proportion of North Dakota students in the program, provided any such payment is based upon a per student annual facilities use charge.

Within the limits of legislative appropriations, any agreements entered pursuant to subsection 1 may provide for the payment by the state board of higher education of North Dakota’s share of the operating costs during the planning, startup, and full operational phases, based upon the proportion of North Dakota students in the program.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 216, § 1.

15-10-29.
Higher education facilities commission — Membership — Appointment — Term — Vacancies. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 4.

15-10-30.
Powers and duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 4.

15-10-31.
Federal money received by commission — Where deposited — How appropriated — How expended. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 4.

15-10-32.
Compensation of commission members — Travel expenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 158, § 4.

15-10-33.
Granting easements to state-owned land by the state board of higher education. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 406, § 2.

15-10-34.
Authorization of contingency funds at institutions under the board of higher education. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 157, § 4.

15-10-35.
Investment of endowment funds by the institutions under the control of the board of higher education. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 182, § 10.

Note.

For present provisions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 15-67.

15-10-36.
Student registration with selective service system.

No person who is required by the Military Selective Service Act [Pub. L. 759; 62 Stat. 604; 50 U.S.C. App. 451 et seq.] to register with the selective service system may receive student financial aid funds from the state until that person has registered. The state board of higher education may adopt rules to achieve the purpose of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 204, § 1.

15-10-37.
Technology occupations student loan program. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 165, § 1; 2003, ch. 131, § 1; 2005, ch. 143, § 1; 2009, ch. 31, § 35; 2017, ch. 125, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 3, § 19, effective July 1, 2019.

15-10-38.
Loans — Teacher shortages — Loan forgiveness. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 166, § 1; 2005, ch. 143, § 2; 2017, ch. 14, § 21, effective July 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 125, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 146, § 4, effective July 1, 2019.